Utah statutes.
7-1-607.   Lost or destroyed account book or certificate.
If the holder of record of an account as shown by the books of a depository
institution, or his legal representative, files with the institution an
affidavit to the effect that the account book or certificate has been lost or
destroyed and has not been pledged or assigned in whole or in part, the
institution shall issue a new account book or certificate in the name of the
holder of record. The new account book or certificate shall state that it is
issued in lieu of the one lost or destroyed. The institution shall not be
liable thereafter on the original account book or certificate. However, the
board of directors of the institution shall, if in its judgment it is
necessary, require a bond in an amount it considers sufficient to indemnify
the institution against any loss which might result from the issuance of the
new account book or certificate.
